Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 3. State Personnel Procedures Relating to Employee Access to Federal Tax.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 25, SLA 2018 (HB 219), which added this article, see 2017 House Journal 895 — 897.

Sec. 39.90.200.
Purpose of AS 39.90.200 — 39.90.290.

It is the purpose of AS

39.90.200

—

39.90.290

to establish procedures to safeguard the confidentiality of protected federal tax information as required by 26 U.S.C. 6103(p)(4). The procedures established in AS

39.90.200

—

39.90.290

apply to a current or prospective state employee whose job duties include access to protected federal tax information.

History.

(§ 3 ch 25 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 25, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.

Sec. 39.90.210.
Background investigation for employees with access to federal tax information.

In connection with an initial application or as a condition of continued employment in a position with the state for which the job duties include access to federal tax information, an agency shall require a prospective or current employee to provide information for a background investigation and request a state and national criminal history record check.

A current or prospective employee whose job duties include access to federal tax information shall provide fingerprints in a format requested by the agency. The agency shall submit the fingerprints and the fees required to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check. The Department of Public Safety may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.

A background investigation under this section, including a state and national criminal history record check, is confidential. The agency that requested the criminal history record check shall use the information obtained under this section to determine whether the current or prospective employee is qualified to access federal tax information. With the written approval of the employee, an agency may share an employee’s background investigation with another agency if the employee applies for employment with, or works for, another agency that has access to federal tax information and the employee’s job duties will include access to federal tax information.

An agency that has access to federal tax information shall develop a written policy establishing procedures and criteria for a background investigation under this section and establish criteria to determine whether a current or prospective employee is qualified to access federal tax information. The policy must require that the agency conduct a reinvestigation not later than 10 years after the date of the previous background investigation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 25 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 25, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.

Sec. 39.90.290.
Definitions.

In AS

39.90.200

—

39.90.290

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“agency” means a department, the Office of the Governor, or an entity in the executive branch, including the University of Alaska, a public or quasi- public corporation, a board or commission, and the Alaska Railroad Corporation;

“employee” means a permanent, probationary, seasonal, temporary, provisional, or nonpermanent employee of an agency, whether in the classified, partially exempt, or exempt service;

“federal tax information” means a federal tax return, return information, and information derived from the federal tax return or return information that is in an agency’s possession or control and that is received directly by an agency under 26 U.S.C. 6103(d) or (l) from the Internal Revenue Service, an Internal Revenue Service authorized secondary source, or another entity acting on behalf of the Internal Revenue Service under 26 U.S.C. 6103(p)(2)(B);

“return” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 6103;

“return information” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 6103.

History.

(§ 3 ch 25 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 25, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.